Florida, session 2026, HB1463.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 817.586, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
817.586 Financial Crimes Intelligence Center.—
(1) CREATION.—There is created the Financial Crimes
Intelligence Center within the Department of Legal Affairs.
(2) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1463-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1463 2026
(a) "Center" means the Financial Crimes Intelligence
Center.
(b) "Department" means the Department of Legal Affairs.
(3) PURPOSE AND ADMINISTRATION.—The center is created for
the following purposes:
(a) To serve as this state's primary entity for the
planning, coordination, and integration of law enforcement
agencies and other governmental agencies that respond to the
following criminal activity:
1. Violations of parts I and II of chapter 817, relating
to false pretenses, frauds, and credit card crimes.
2. Violations of chapter 831, relating to forgery and
counterfeiting.
3. Violations of chapter 832, relating to checks and
drafts.
(b) To maximize the ability of the department, law
enforcement agencies, and other governmental agencies to detect,
prevent, and respond to criminal activities related to financial
fraud.
(4) OPERATION AGREEMENTS AUTHORIZED; DIRECTOR.—
(a) The department:
1. May enter into agreements with law enforcement agencies
or other governmental agencies for the operation of the center.
2. Shall enter into an agreement with a law enforcement
agency or other governmental agency for the appointment of a
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1463-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1463 2026
director to supervise and manage the operation of the center.
(b) The director shall be a licensed attorney or law
enforcement officer.
(c) Information that a law enforcement agency or other
governmental agency collects and maintains under an agreement
entered into with the department under this subsection is the
intellectual property of the center. On termination of any
agreement, the contracting agency shall transfer such
information to the department in accordance with the terms of
the agreement.
(5) POWERS AND DUTIES.—
(a) The center shall assist law enforcement agencies,
other governmental agencies, financial institutions, credit card
issuers, debit card issuers, payment card networks, institutions
of higher education, and merchants in their efforts to develop
and implement strategies to prevent financial crimes.
(b) The center may do all of the following:
1. Collaborate with federal, state, and local governmental
agencies to accomplish the purposes of the center.
2. Serve as a centralized collection point for information
related to payment card fraud.
3. Provide training and educational opportunities to law
enforcement officers and agencies.
4. Provide outreach to the public.
5. Release information to affected financial institutions,
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1463-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1463 2026
credit card issuers, debit card issuers, payment card networks,
institutions of higher education, and merchants if the center
does not consider the information to be sensitive to law
enforcement. Information is considered sensitive to law
enforcement if the information could cause harm to law
enforcement activities or jeopardize an investigation or
operation if disclosed.
(6) ANNUAL REPORT.—Beginning December 1, 2027, the
director shall submit an annual report to the department, which
shall include all of the following:
(a) A plan of operation for the center and an estimate of
the funding necessary to implement the plan.
(b) An assessment of the current state of financial fraud
in this state, including:
1. An identification of the geographic locations in this
state that have the highest statistical probability for
financial fraud; and
2. A summary of financial fraud statistics for the year in
which the report is filed.
(c) A detailed plan of operation for combatting financial
fraud.
(d) A communications plan for outreach to law enforcement
agencies, financial institutions, credit card issuers, debit
card issuers, payment card networks, merchants, and the public.
100 (e) A list of expenditures made since the most recent
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1463-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1463 2026
101 report was filed with the department.
102 (7) The department shall adopt rules as necessary to
103 implement this section.
104 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1463-00